Maine, session 132, LD177.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §1101, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B,
§139, is further amended to read:
C. Money credited to the fund may be expended by the The office to shall on an annual
basis provide 10% of the money credited to the fund as reimbursement to a
municipality for qualifying expenses incurred as a result of the municipality's
municipalities opting to permit the operation of some or all adult use cannabis
establishments within the municipality. For the purposes of this paragraph, "qualifying
expenses" means legal fees and costs associated with the drafting and adoption of a
warrant article or the adoption or amendment of an ordinance, including the conduct
of a town meeting or election, by a municipality that opted to permit the operation of
some or all cannabis establishments within the municipality. Each municipality may
receive funds, not to exceed $20,000, only once for the reimbursement of qualifying
expenses in accordance with this paragraph. Nothing in this paragraph may be
construed to require the office to reimburse qualifying expenses incurred by a
municipality if the office determines there are insufficient funds available to provide
reimbursement. Under no circumstances may a municipality submit an initial
application for the reimbursement of qualifying expenses more than 3 years after the
municipality adopts a warrant article or adopts or amends an ordinance to allow for the
operation of some or all adult use cannabis establishments within the municipality. The
office may adopt rules to implement and administer the reimbursement of qualifying
expenses to municipalities. Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A. The office may not
reimburse qualifying expenses under this paragraph accrued after July 1, 2027. The
office shall distribute the reimbursement equally to all municipalities that qualify for
the reimbursement.